Virginia statutes. Constitution of Virginia [1971]
Article II. Franchise and Officers.

§ 1. (Proposed amendment — see Editor’s note) Qualifications of voters.

In elections by the people, the qualifications of voters shall be as follows: Each voter shall be a citizen of the United States, shall be eighteen years of age, shall fulfill the residence requirements set forth in this section, and shall be registered to vote pursuant to this article. No person who has been convicted of a felony shall be qualified to vote unless his civil rights have been restored by the Governor or other appropriate authority. As prescribed by law, no person adjudicated to be mentally incompetent shall be qualified to vote until his competency has been reestablished.

The residence requirements shall be that each voter shall be a resident of the Commonwealth and of the precinct where he votes. Residence, for all purposes of qualification to vote, requires both domicile and a place of abode. The General Assembly may provide for persons who are employed overseas, and their spouses and dependents residing with them, and who are qualified to vote except for relinquishing their place of abode in the Commonwealth while overseas, to vote in the Commonwealth subject to conditions and time limits defined by law. The General Assembly may provide for persons who are qualified to vote except for having moved their residence from one precinct to another within the Commonwealth to continue to vote in a former precinct subject to conditions and time limits defined by law. The General Assembly may also provide, in elections for President and Vice President of the United States, alternatives to registration for new residents of the Commonwealth.

Any person who will be qualified with respect to age to vote at the next general election shall be permitted to register in advance and also to vote in any intervening primary or special election.

Cross references.

For statutory provisions as to qualification of voters, see §§

24.2-400

through

24.2-403

.

Proposed amendment.

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 2021 Special Session I (Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 516 and 519) and was referred to the 2022 Regular Session. If again agreed to at that session the amendment would redesignate the existing three paragraphs as subsections (a) through (c), and rewrite the first paragraph to read: “(a) In elections by the people, the qualifications of voters shall be as follows: Each voter shall be a citizen of the United States, shall be eighteen years of age, shall fulfill the residence requirements set forth in subsection (b), and shall be registered to vote pursuant to this article. Every person who meets these qualifications shall have the fundamental right to vote in the Commonwealth, and such right shall not be abridged by law, except that:

“(1) No person who has been convicted of a felony shall be entitled to vote during any period of incarceration for such felony conviction, but every such person, upon release from incarceration for that felony conviction and without further action required of him, shall be invested with all political rights, including the right to vote; and

“(2) No person who has been adjudicated by a court of competent jurisdiction to lack the capacity to understand the act of voting shall be entitled to vote during such period of incapacity until his capacity has been reestablished as prescribed by law.”

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1997 Regular Session (Acts 1997, c. 767) and was referred to the 1998 Session. It was again agreed to at that session (Acts 1998, cc. 186 and 768) and submitted to the people November 3, 1998, when it was ratified. The amendment, effective January 1, 1999, inserted the third sentence in the second paragraph.

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1995 Regular Session (Acts 1995, c. 705) and was referred to the 1996 Session. It was again agreed to at that Session (Acts 1996, cc. 64 and 907) and submitted to the people November 5, 1996, when it was ratified. The amendment, effective January 1, 1997, in the second paragraph, deleted the former second sentence which read: “A person who is qualified to vote except for having moved his residence from one precinct to another may in the following November general election and in any intervening election vote in the precinct from which he has moved,” added the next-to-the-last sentence and inserted “also” preceding “provide” in the last sentence.

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1975 Session (Acts 1975, c. 653), and referred to the 1976 Session. It was again agreed to at that session (Acts 1976, cc. 751, 782) and submitted to the people Nov. 2, 1976, when it was ratified. The amendment substituted “be” for “have been” near the beginning of the first sentence in the second paragraph, deleted “for six months” following “Commonwealth” in that sentence, and “for thirty days” at the end of that sentence, substituted “may in the following November general election and in any intervening election vote” for “fewer than thirty days prior to an election may in any such election vote” near the middle of the second sentence in the second paragraph, and deleted “a resident requirement of less than six months and” following “United States” in the last sentence of that paragraph.

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1971 Extra Session (Acts 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 266), and referred to the 1972 Session. It was again agreed to at that session (Acts 1972, cc. 628, 868) and submitted to the people November 7, 1972, when it was ratified. The amendment substituted “eighteen” for “twenty-one” in the first sentence.

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 2003 Session (Acts 2003, cc. 956 and 958) and was referred to the 2004 Session. The amendment, if ratified, will insert a third sentence in the first paragraph, which reads: “In addition, the General Assembly may provide by general law for the restoration of civil rights to persons who have been convicted of nonviolent felonies and who fulfill the conditions prescribed by such laws.” At the 2004 Session, the General Assembly did not again agree to the amendment.

An amendment to this section proposed and agreed to by Acts 1981, c. 639 and Acts 1982, cc. 396, 686, and submitted to the people Nov. 2, 1982, was defeated.

Law Review.

For comment on rights of the convicted felon on parole, see 13 U. Rich. L. Rev. 367 (1979).

For note, “The Clemency Process in Virginia”, see 27 U. Rich. L. Rev. 241 (1993).

For note, “Felon Disenfranchisement: The Unconscionable Social Contract Breached,” see 89 Va. L. Rev. 109 (2003).

For annual survey article, “Election Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 403 (2009).

For comment, “Lifting the Fog: Ending Felony Disenfranchisement in Virginia,” see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 471 (2012).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
6B M.J. Elections, §§ 14, 17.

§ 2. Registration of voters.

The General Assembly shall provide by law for the registration of all persons otherwise qualified to vote who have met the residence requirements contained in this article, and shall ensure that the opportunity to register is made available. Registrations accomplished prior to the effective date of this section shall be effective hereunder. The registration records shall not be closed to new or transferred registrations more than thirty days before the election in which they are to be used.

Applications to register shall require the applicant to provide the following information on a standard form: full name; date of birth; residence address; social security number, if any; whether the applicant is presently a United States citizen; and such additional information as may be required by law. All applications to register shall be completed by or at the direction of the applicant and signed by the applicant, unless physically disabled. No fee shall be charged to the applicant incident to an application to register.

Nothing in this article shall preclude the General Assembly from requiring as a prerequisite to registration to vote the ability of the applicant to read and complete in his own handwriting the application to register.

Cross references.

As to who may be registered, see Va. Const., Art. II, § 1 and §

24.2-417

.

For qualifications of voters generally, see §§

24.2-400

through

24.2-403

.

For statutory provisions as to registration of voters, see §

24.2-417

et seq.

Amendment ratified Nov. 5, 1996. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1995 Regular Session (Acts 1995, c. 705) and was referred to the 1996 Session. It was again agreed to at that Session (Acts 1996, cc. 64 and 907) and submitted to the people November 5, 1996, when it was ratified. The amendment, effective January 1, 1997, in the second paragraph, deleted “including the maiden and any other prior legal name; age” following “full name,” deleted “and place” following “date,” inserted “residence address” following “of birth,” and substituted “and such additional information as may be required by law” for “address and place of abode and date of residence in the precinct; place of any previous registrations to vote; and whether the applicant has ever been adjudicated to be mentally incompetent or convicted of a felony, and if so, under what circumstances the applicant’s right to vote has been restored.”

Amendment ratified Nov. 8, 1994. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1993 Session (Acts 1993, c. 891) and the 1994 Session (Acts 1994, cc. 677 and 816), and ratified by the people at the general election held Nov. 8, 1994. The amendment, effective January 1, 1995, in the second paragraph, deleted “under oath” preceding “the following information” in the first sentence, and in the second sentence, deleted “Except as otherwise provided in this Constitution” preceding “All,” and deleted “in person before the registrar and” following “shall be completed.”

The YYYY amendments.

Amendment ratified Nov. 2, 1982. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1981 Session (Acts 1981, c. 645) and the 1982 Session (Acts 1982, cc. 164, 685) and was ratified by the people at the general election held Nov. 2, 1982. The amendment substituted “and any other prior legal name” for “name of a woman, if married” in the first sentence of the second paragraph and will delete “marital status; occupation;” following “place of birth;” in that sentence.

The YYYY amendments.

Amendment ratified Nov. 2, 1976. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1975 Session (Acts 1975, c. 653), and referred to the 1976 Session. It was again agreed to at that session (Acts 1976, cc. 751, 782) and submitted to the people Nov. 2, 1976, when it was ratified. The amendment substituted “date of residence in the precinct; place of any previous registrations” for “length of residence in the Commonwealth and in the precinct; place and time of any previous registrations” near the middle of the second paragraph.

Law Review.

For survey of election law reform in Virginia, see 12 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 333 (1970).

For article, “Voting Rights Act Amendments of 1982: The New Bailout Provision and Virginia,” see 69 Va. L. Rev. 765 (1983).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
6B M.J. Elections, §§ 16, 20, 22.

§ 3. Method of voting.

In elections by the people, the following safeguards shall be maintained. Voting shall be by ballot or by machines for receiving, recording, and counting votes cast. No ballot or list of candidates upon any voting machine shall bear any distinguishing mark or symbol, other than words identifying political party affiliation; and their form, including the offices to be filled and the listing of candidates or nominees, shall be as uniform as is practicable throughout the Commonwealth or smaller governmental unit in which the election is held.

In elections other than primary elections, provision shall be made whereby votes may be cast for persons other than the listed candidates or nominees. Secrecy in casting votes shall be maintained, except as provision may be made for assistance to handicapped voters, but the ballot box or voting machine shall be kept in public view and shall not be opened, nor the ballots canvassed nor the votes counted, in secret. Votes may be cast in person or by absentee ballot as provided by law.

Cross references.

As to forms of ballots and insertion of names, see §§

24.2-613

through

24.2-615

,

24.2-643

,

24.2-644

.

For statutory provisions concerning items in the next-to-last sentence of this section, see §§

24.2-624

,

24.2-655

,

24.2-665

,

24.2-667

.

For provisions concerning voting machines, see §§

24.2-625

through

24.2-642

.

Amendment ratified Nov. 8, 1994. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1993 Session (Acts 1993, c. 891) and the 1994 Session (Acts 1994, cc. 677 and 816), and ratified by the people at the general election held Nov. 8, 1994. The amendment, effective January 1, 1995, in the second paragraph, in the second sentence, deleted “only” following “cast,” and substituted “or by absentee ballot as provided by law” for “except as otherwise provided in this article.”

Law Review.

For survey of election law reform in Virginia, see 12 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 333 (1970).

For annual survey of Virginia law article, “Election Law,” see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 181 (2012).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
6B M.J. Elections, §§ 50, 63.

§ 4. Powers and duties of General Assembly.

The General Assembly shall establish a uniform system for permanent registration of voters pursuant to this Constitution, including provisions for appeal by any person denied registration, correction of illegal or fraudulent registrations, penalties for illegal, fraudulent, or false registrations, proper transfer of all registered voters, and cancellation of registrations in other jurisdictions of persons who apply to register to vote in the Commonwealth. The General Assembly shall provide for maintenance of accurate and current registration records and may provide for the cancellation of registrations for such purpose.

The General Assembly shall provide for the nomination of candidates, shall regulate the time, place, manner, conduct, and administration of primary, general, and special elections, and shall have power to make any other law regulating elections not inconsistent with this Constitution.

Cross references.

For statutory provisions concerning the items enumerated in the first sentence of this section, see §§

24.2-422

,

24.2-424

through

24.2-435

.

For statutory provisions regarding pure elections and election offenses, see §§

24.2-945

through

24.2-1019

.

Amendment ratified Nov. 8, 1994. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1993 Session (Acts 1993, c. 891) and the 1994 Session (Acts 1994, cc. 677 and 816), and ratified by the people at the general election held Nov. 8, 1994. The amendment, effective January 1, 1995, in the first paragraph, inserted “penalties for illegal, fraudulent, or false registrations” in the first sentence, and in the second sentence, substituted “may provide” for “shall provide,” inserted “the” preceding “cancellation,” substituted “registrations for such purpose” for “the registration,” and deleted “of any voter who has not voted at least once during four consecutive calendar years and who fails to return a written response indicating a desire to remain registered at the residence address currently on record in response to a notice of pending cancellation” following “registrations for such purpose”; and deleted the former second paragraph relating to the registration and voting by absentee application and ballot.

The YYYY amendments.

Amendment ratified Nov. 4, 1986. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1985 Session (Acts 1985, c. 591), and again agreed to at the 1986 Session (Acts 1986, cc. 242, 647) and was ratified by the people at the general election held Nov. 4, 1986. The amendment, added the language “and who fails to return a written response indicating a desire to remain registered at the residence address currently on record in response to a notice of pending cancellation” at the end of the last sentence of the first paragraph.

The YYYY amendments.

Amendment ratified Nov. 2, 1976. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1975 Session (Acts 1975, c. 653), and referred to the 1976 Session. It was again agreed to at that session (Acts 1976, cc. 751, 782) and submitted to the people Nov. 2, 1976, when it was ratified. The amendment inserted “persons residing temporarily outside of the United States by virtue of their employment” and “and dependents residing with such persons” in the second paragraph.

Law Review.

For survey of election law reform in Virginia, see 12 Wm. & Mary Rev. 333 (1970).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
6B M.J. Elections, §§ 19, 57, 87.

§ 5. Qualifications to hold elective office.

The only qualification to hold any office of the Commonwealth or of its governmental units, elective by the people, shall be that a person must have been a resident of the Commonwealth for one year next preceding his election and be qualified to vote for that office, except as otherwise provided in this Constitution, and except that:

the General Assembly may impose more restrictive geographical residence requirements for election of its members, and may permit other governing bodies in the Commonwealth to impose more restrictive geographical residence requirements for election to such governing bodies, but no such requirements shall impair equal representation of the persons entitled to vote;

the General Assembly may provide that residence in a local governmental unit is not required for election to designated elective offices in local governments, other than membership in the local governing body; and

nothing in this Constitution shall limit the power of the General Assembly to prevent conflict of interests, dual officeholding, or other incompatible activities by elective or appointive officials of the Commonwealth or of any political subdivision.

Cross references.

For provisions relating to eligibility, qualifications, etc., for public office, see §§

2.2-2800

through

2.2-2808

.

The YYYY amendments.

Amendment ratified Nov. 2, 1976. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1975 Session (Acts 1975, c. 653), and referred to the 1976 Session. It was again agreed to at that session (Acts 1976, cc. 751, 782) and submitted to the people Nov. 2, 1976, when it was ratified. The amendment inserted “next preceding his election” near the end of the first paragraph.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
5A M.J. Counties, § 19;
15 M.J. Public Officers, § 4.

§ 6. Apportionment.

Members of the House of Representatives of the United States and members of the Senate and of the House of Delegates of the General Assembly shall be elected from electoral districts established pursuant to Section 6-A of this Constitution. Every electoral district shall be composed of contiguous and compact territory and shall be so constituted as to give, as nearly as is practicable, representation in proportion to the population of the district. Every electoral district shall be drawn in accordance with the requirements of federal and state laws that address racial and ethnic fairness, including the Equal Protection Clause of the Fourteenth Amendment to the Constitution of the United States and provisions of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, as amended, and judicial decisions interpreting such laws. Districts shall provide, where practicable, opportunities for racial and ethnic communities to elect candidates of their choice.

The Commonwealth shall be reapportioned into electoral districts in accordance with this section and Section 6-A in the year 2021 and every ten years thereafter.

Any such decennial reapportionment law shall take effect immediately and not be subject to the limitations contained in Article IV, Section 13, of this Constitution.

The districts delineated in the decennial reapportionment law shall be implemented for the November general election for the United States House of Representatives, Senate, or House of Delegates, respectively, that is held immediately prior to the expiration of the term being served in the year that the reapportionment law is required to be enacted. A member in office at the time that a decennial redistricting law is enacted shall complete his term of office and shall continue to represent the district from which he was elected for the duration of such term of office so long as he does not move his residence from the district from which he was elected. Any vacancy occurring during such term shall be filled from the same district that elected the member whose vacancy is being filled.

Amendment ratified November 3, 2020. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 2019 Regular Session (Acts 2019, cc. 821 and 824), and was referred to the 2020 Regular Session. It was again agreed to at the 2020 Regular Session (Acts 2020, cc. 1070, 1071, 1196) and was ratified by the people on November 3, 2020. The amendment, effective November 15, 2020, in the first paragraph, substituted “pursuant to Section 6-A of this Constitution” for “by the General Assembly” at the end of the first sentence and added “Every electoral district shall be drawn in accordance with the requirements of federal and state laws that address racial and ethnic fairness, including the Equal Protection Clause of the Fourteenth Amendment to the Constitution of the United States and provisions of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, as amended, and judicial decisions interpreting such laws. Districts shall provide, where practicable, opportunities for racial and ethnic communities to elect candidates of their choice” at the end; and in the second paragraph, substituted “The Commonwealth shall be reapportioned” for “The General Assembly shall reapportion the Commonwealth” and “and Section 6-A in the year 2021” for “in the year 2011.”

Amendment ratified Nov. 2, 2004. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 2003 Session (Acts 2003, c. 957) and the 2004 Session (Acts 2004, cc. 873 and 981) and ratified by the people at the general election held Nov. 2, 2004. The amendment, effective Jan. 1, 2005, substituted “2011” for “1971” near the end of the first paragraph, inserted “decennial” after “any such” in the second paragraph, and added the third paragraph.

Proposed amendment not agreed to by General Assembly. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 2019 Regular Session (Acts 2019, c. 820), and was referred to the 2020 Regular Session. If ratified, the amendment would insert a third paragraph, which reads: “Subsequent to the enactment of any decennial reapportionment law, the General Assembly may make technical adjustments to legislative electoral district boundaries solely for the purpose of causing such district boundaries to coincide with the boundaries of voting precincts established in the counties and cities. Such adjustments shall change legislative electoral district boundaries only to the extent necessary to accomplish this purpose, and any change made shall be consistent with any criteria for legislative electoral districts adopted for the preceding decennial redistricting.” At the 2020 Session, the General Assembly did not again agree to the amendment.

Proposed amendment not agreed to by General Assembly. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1981 Session (Acts 1981, c. 640), and referred to the 1982 Session. At the 1982 Session the General Assembly did not again agree to the amendment.

Law Review.

For article, “The Virginia Legislative Reapportionment Case: Reapportionment Issues Of The 1980’s,” see 5 G.M.U. L. Rev. 1 (1982).

For note discussing the 1981 redistricting process in Virginia, see 68 Va. L. Rev. 541 (1982).

For an article, “Redistricting in the Post-2000 Era,” see 8 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 431 (2000).

For an article, “Down For the Count:
The Constitutional, Political and Policy Related Problems of Census Sampling,” see 8 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 477 (2000).

For annual survey of Virginia law, “Election Law and Government Ethics,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 119 (2011).

For annual survey of Virginia law article, “Election Law,” see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 181 (2012).

For Article: “A Half-century of Virginia Redistricting Battles: Shifting from Rural Malapportionment to Voting Rights to Public Participation,” see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 771 (2013).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

19 M.J. United States, § 3.

§ 6-A. Virginia Redistricting Commission.

In the year 2020 and every ten years thereafter, the Virginia Redistricting Commission (the Commission) shall be convened for the purpose of establishing districts for the United States House of Representatives and for the Senate and the House of Delegates of the General Assembly pursuant to Article II, Section 6 of this Constitution.

The Commission shall consist of sixteen commissioners who shall be selected in accordance with the provisions of this subsection.

Eight commissioners shall be legislative members, four of whom shall be members of the Senate of Virginia and four of whom shall be members of the House of Delegates. These commissioners shall be appointed no later than December 1 of the year ending in zero and shall continue to serve until their successors are appointed.

Two commissioners shall represent the political party having the highest number of members in the Senate of Virginia and shall be appointed by the President pro tempore of the Senate of Virginia.

Two commissioners shall represent the political party having the next highest number of members in the Senate of Virginia and shall be appointed by the leader of that political party.

Two commissioners shall represent the political party having the highest number of members in the House of Delegates and shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Delegates.

Two commissioners shall represent the political party having the next highest number of members in the House of Delegates and shall be appointed by the leader of that political party.

Eight commissioners shall be citizen members who shall be selected in accordance with the provisions of this subdivision and in the manner determined by the General Assembly by general law.

There shall be a Redistricting Commission Selection Committee (the Committee) consisting of five retired judges of the circuit courts of Virginia. By November 15 of the year ending in zero, the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court of Virginia shall certify to the Speaker of the House of Delegates, the leader in the House of Delegates of the political party having the next highest number of members in the House of Delegates, the President pro tempore of the Senate of Virginia, and the leader in the Senate of Virginia of the political party having the next highest number of members in the Senate a list of retired judges of the circuit courts of Virginia who are willing to serve on the Committee, and these members shall each select a judge from the list. The four judges selected to serve on the Committee shall select, by a majority vote, a judge from the list prescribed herein to serve as the fifth member of the Committee and to serve as the chairman of the Committee.

By January 1 of the year ending in one, the Speaker of the House of Delegates, the leader in the House of Delegates of the political party having the next highest number of members in the House of Delegates, the President pro tempore of the Senate of Virginia, and the leader in the Senate of the political party having the next highest number of members in the Senate shall each submit to the Committee a list of at least sixteen citizen candidates for service on the Commission. Such citizen candidates shall meet the criteria established by the General Assembly by general law.The Committee shall select, by a majority vote, two citizen members from each list submitted. No member or employee of the Congress of the United States or of the General Assembly shall be eligible to serve as a citizen member.

By February 1 of the year ending in one, the Commission shall hold a public meeting at which it shall select a chairman from its membership. The chairman shall be a citizen member and shall be responsible for coordinating the work of the Commission.

The Commission shall submit to the General Assembly plans for districts for the Senate and the House of Delegates of the General Assembly no later than 45 days following the receipt of census data and shall submit to the General Assembly plans for districts for the United States House of Representatives no later than 60 days following the receipt of census data or by the first day of July of that year, whichever occurs later.

To be submitted as a proposed plan for districts for members of the United States House of Representatives, a plan shall receive affirmative votes of at least six of the eight legislative members and six of the eight citizen members.

To be submitted as a proposed plan for districts for members of the Senate, a plan shall receive affirmative votes of at least six of the eight legislative members, including at least three of the four legislative members who are members of the Senate, and at least six of the eight citizen members.

To be submitted as a proposed plan for districts for members of the House of Delegates, a plan shall receive affirmative votes of at least six of the eight legislative members, including at least three of the four legislative members who are members of the House of Delegates, and at least six of the eight citizen members.

Plans for districts for the Senate and the House of Delegates shall be embodied in and voted on as a single bill. The vote on any bill embodying a plan for districts shall be taken in accordance with the provisions of Article IV, Section 11 of this Constitution, except that no amendments shall be permitted. Such bills shall not be subject to the provisions contained in Article V, Section 6 of this Constitution.

Within fifteen days of receipt of a plan for districts, the General Assembly shall take a vote on the bill embodying that plan in accordance with the provisions of subsection (e). If the General Assembly fails to adopt such bill by this deadline, the Commission shall submit a new plan for districts to the General Assembly within fourteen days of the General Assembly’s failure to adopt the bill. The General Assembly shall take a vote on the bill embodying such plan within seven days of receipt of the plan. If the General Assembly fails to adopt such bill by this deadline, the districts shall be established by the Supreme Court of Virginia.

If the Commission fails to submit a plan for districts by the deadline set forth in subsection (d), the Commission shall have fourteen days following its initial failure to submit a plan to the General Assembly. If the Commission fails to submit a plan for districts to the General Assembly by this deadline, the districts shall be established by the Supreme Court of Virginia.If the Commission submits a plan for districts within fourteen days following its initial failure to submit a plan, the General Assembly shall take a vote on the bill embodying such plan within seven days of its receipt. If the General Assembly fails to adopt such bill by this deadline, the districts shall be established by the Supreme Court of Virginia.

All meetings of the Commission shall be open to the public. Prior to proposing any redistricting plans and prior to voting on redistricting plans, the Commission shall hold at least three public hearings in different parts of the Commonwealth to receive and consider comments from the public.

All records and documents of the Commission, or any individual or group performing delegated functions of or advising the Commission, related to the Commission’s work, including internal communications and communications from outside parties, shall be considered public information.

Cross references.

As to the Virginia Redistricting Commission, generally, see § 30-391 et seq.

Amendment ratified November 3, 2020. —

This section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 2019 Regular Session (Acts 2019, cc. 821 and 824) and was referred to the 2020 Regular Session. It was again agreed to at the 2020 Regular Session (Acts 2020, cc. 1070, 1071, 1196) and ratified by the people on November 3, 2020. This section is effective November 15, 2020.

§ 7. Oath or affirmation.

All officers elected or appointed under or pursuant to this Constitution shall, before they enter on the performance of their public duties, severally take and subscribe the following oath or affirmation:

“I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will support the Constitution of the United States, and the Constitution of the Commonwealth of Virginia, and that I will faithfully and impartially discharge all the duties incumbent upon me as . . . . . . . . . . ., according to the best of my ability (so help me God).”

Cross references.

For statutory provision as to form of general oath, see §

49-1

.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
6B M.J. Elections, § 9;
15 M.J. Public Officers, § 6.

§ 8. Electoral boards; registrars and officers of election.

There shall be in each county and city an electoral board composed of three members, selected as provided by law. In the appointment of the electoral boards, representation, as far as practicable, shall be given to each of the two political parties which, at the general election next preceding their appointment, cast the highest and the next highest number of votes. The present members of such boards shall continue in office until the expiration of their respective terms; thereafter their successors shall be appointed for the term of three years. Any vacancy occurring in any board shall be filled by the same authority for the unexpired term.

Each electoral board shall appoint the officers of election and general registrar for its county or city. In appointing such officers of election, representation, as far as practicable, shall be given to each of the two political parties which, at the general election next preceding their appointment, cast the highest and next highest number of votes.

No person, nor the deputy of any person, who is employed by or holds any office or post of profit or emolument, or who holds any elective office of profit or trust, under the governments of the United States, the Commonwealth, or any county, city, or town, shall be appointed a member of the electoral board or general registrar. No person, nor the deputy or the employee of any person, who holds any elective office of profit or trust under the government of the United States, the Commonwealth, or any county, city, or town of the Commonwealth, shall be appointed an assistant registrar or officer of election.

Cross references.

For statutory provisions relating to local electoral boards, see §§

15.2-3826

and

24.2-106

through

24.2-109

.

For statutory provisions relating to State Board of Elections, see §§

24.2-102

through

24.2-105.2

.

Defeat of proposed amendment. —

An amendment to this section proposed and agreed to by Acts 1975, c. 653, and Acts 1976, cc. 751, 782, and submitted to the people Nov. 2, 1976, was defeated.

The YYYY amendments.

Amendment ratified Nov. 4, 1986. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1985 Session (Acts 1985, c. 591), and again agreed to at the 1986 Session (Acts 1986, cc. 242, 647) and was ratified by the people at the general election held Nov. 4, 1986. The amendment substituted “officers of election and general registrar” for “officers and registrars of election” in the first sentence of the second paragraph, substituted “or general registrar” for “or registrar or officer of election” at the end of the first sentence of the last paragraph, and added a second sentence to the last paragraph, reading, “No person, nor the deputy or the employee of any person, who holds any elective office of profit or trust under the government of the United States, the Commonwealth, or any county, city, or town of the Commonwealth, shall be appointed an assistant registrar or officer of election.”

Law Review.

For survey of election law reform in Virginia, see 12 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 333 (1970).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
6B M.J. Elections, §§ 7-9.

§ 9. Privileges of voters during election.

No voter, during the time of holding any election at which he is entitled to vote, shall be compelled to perform military service, except in time of war or public danger, nor to attend any court as suitor, juror, or witness; nor shall any such voter be subject to arrest under any civil process during his attendance at election or in going to or returning therefrom.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
2A M.J. Arrest, § 2.